Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.315.055

Conflicting or incorrectly described school district boundaries.

In case the boundaries of any of the school districts are conflicting or incorrectly described, the educational service district board of directors, after due notice and a public hearing, shall change, harmonize, and describe them and shall so certify, with a complete transcript of boundaries of all districts affected, such action to the superintendent of public instruction for approval or revision. Upon receipt of notification of action by the superintendent of public instruction, the educational service district superintendent shall transmit to the county legislative authority of the county or counties in which the affected districts are located a complete transcript of the boundaries of all districts affected.

[ 2006 c 263 s 506; 1999 c 315 s 203.]

NOTES:

Findings—Purpose—Part headings not law—2006 c 263: See notes following RCW 28A.150.230.